Illinois, session 104th, HB5250.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Installment Sales Contract Act is amended 5by changing Section 5 as follows: 6    (765 ILCS 67/5)7    Sec. 5. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the 8context otherwise requires:9    "Amortization schedule" means a written schedule which 10sets forth the date of each periodic payment, the amount of 11each periodic payment that will be applied to the principal 12balance and the resulting principal balance, and the amount of 13each periodic payment that will be applied to any interest 14charged, if applicable, pursuant to the contract. 15    "Balloon payment" means a payment, other than the initial 16down payment, in which more than the ordinary periodic payment 17is charged during the contract. 18    "Business day" means any calendar day except Saturday, 19Sunday, or a State or federal holiday.20    "Buyer" means the person who is seeking to obtain title to 21a property by an installment sales contract or is obligated to 22make payments to the seller pursuant to the contract. 23    "Date of sale" means the date that both the seller and   HB5250- 2 -LRB104 17763 JRC 31195 b1buyer have signed the written contract. 2    "Dwelling structure" means any private home or residence 3or any building or structure intended for residential use with 4not less than one nor more than 4 residential dwelling units.5    "Installment sales contract" or "contract" means any 6contract or agreement, including a contract for deed, bond for 7deed, or any other sale or legal device whereby a seller agrees 8to sell and the buyer agrees to buy a residential real estate, 9in which the consideration for the sale is payable in 10installments for a period of at least one year after the date 11of sale, and the seller continues to have an interest or 12security for the purchase price or otherwise in the property. 13"Installment sales contract" does not include a financing 14arrangement that for religious or cultural reasons does not 15allow the imposition or collection of interest and that is 16offered by a person, partnership, association, limited 17liability company, or corporation doing business under and as 18permitted by any law of this State or the United States 19relating to banks, savings and loan associations, savings 20banks, credit unions, or third-party religious or cultural 21lenders. 22    "Residential real estate" means real estate with a 23dwelling structure, excluding property that is sold as a part 24of a tract of land consisting of 4 acres or more zoned for 25agricultural purposes.26    "Seller" means an individual or legal entity that   HB5250- 3 -LRB104 17763 JRC 31195 b1possesses a legal or beneficial interest in real estate and 2that enters into an installment sales contract more than 3 3times during a continuous 12-month period to sell residential 4real estate. Any individual or legal entity that has a legal or 5beneficial interest in real estate under the name of more than 6one legal entity shall be considered the same seller. This Act 7shall only apply to contracts entered into once an individual 8or legal entity has qualified as a "seller". 9    "Third-party religious or cultural lender" means an 10individual or legal entity licensed under the Residential 11Mortgage License Act of 1987 that is in compliance with the 12principles and norms of an established religious or cultural 13legal system and that is obtaining an interest in a 14residential dwelling solely as collateral security for a 15financing arrangement that for religious or cultural reasons 16does not allow the imposition or collection of interest and 17had no interest in the residential dwelling prior to the 18consummation of the financing arrangement, other than an 19interest in the nature of collateral security that may have 20been obtained as part of a prior financing arrangement made by 21the third-party lender.22(Source: P.A. 100-416, eff. 1-1-18; 100-626, eff. 7-20-18; 23101-557, eff. 6-1-20.) 24    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 25becoming law.